Idaho, session 2026, S1348.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 18, Title 36, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 36-1808, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
36-1808. PUBLIC OUTDOOR TARGET RANGES.
(1)(a) The legislature finds that:
(i) In 2023, the legislature, through House Bill No. 304, as
enacted by the first regular session of the sixty-seventh Idaho
legislature, directed the Idaho fish and game commission to ex-
pend up to five million dollars ($5,000,000) in federal funds re-
ceived pursuant to the Pittman-Robertson wildfire restoration act
and such moneys as the state is required to match such said federal
funds. Such moneys were appropriated for the acquisition of forty
(40) to sixty (60) acres of land owned by Kootenai county adjacent
to the Coeur d'Alene airport in north Idaho, so that the skeet and
trap shooting range, located on such county-owned land, could con-
tinue in operation.
(ii) The acquisition of such land owned by Kootenai county may not
be possible;
(iii) The alternative proposed by the Idaho department of fish and
game, whereby the department will lease the land owned by Kootenai
county so that the current skeet and trap club can continue operat-
ing in its current form and location until such time as a new shot-
gun sporting complex can be constructed and opened to the public
adjacent to Farragut state park as soon as is practicable after De-
cember 31, 2039, is a sound alternative that should be pursued;
(iv) The Coeur d'Alene skeet and trap club, established as an im-
portant nonprofit in Idaho in 1947, continues to provide an in-
valuable service to the residents of north Idaho, and, to the ex-
tent possible, should be allowed to continue its mission and ser-
vice at its current location and any new location that may be cre-
ated pursuant to this section; and
(v) The continuation of the long-standing skeet and trap club
and expansion of such public outdoor target range opportunities
in north Idaho is consistent with this chapter and the purpose for
which such funds are available.
(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to:


(i) Ensure the continuation and provide for the expansion of
public outdoor target range recreational opportunities in north
Idaho through the use of moneys previously appropriated through
House Bill No. 304, as enacted by the first regular session of the
sixty-seventh Idaho legislature; and
(ii) Support the continuation of the long-standing Coeur d'Alene
skeet and trap club as an invaluable part of north Idaho's commu-
nity and economy.
(2) The commission shall develop a long-term plan for the development
of a shotgun sporting complex to be located on Idaho fish and game lands adja-
cent to Farragut state park. Such plan, and revisions thereto, shall be made
publicly available and provided to the house resources and conservation com-
mittee and senate resources and environment committee for their review dur-
ing the 2027 legislative session.
(a) Such plan shall be reviewed by the commission at least every five
(5) years and shall be revised by the commission to reflect changes in
land use, technologies, and planning and as the commission deems neces-
sary.
(b) Upon request by the commission, the department of fish and game may:
(i) Assist the commission in the development and execution of the
plan;
(ii) Enter into negotiations to lease or acquire property; and
(iii) Perform such other duties as may be requested.
(c) The commission may execute such leases or acquisitions on behalf of
and in the name of the state of Idaho pursuant to section 36-104, Idaho
Code.
(3) The commission shall coordinate its efforts with the director of
the department of fish and game to promptly develop and open to the public a
shotgun sporting complex on Idaho fish and game lands adjacent to Farragut
state park no later than December 31, 2040. The shotgun sporting complex
shall include, at least:
(a) Six (6) combination trap and skeet fields;
(b) Fifteen (15) sporting clay stations with at least four (4) mechani-
cal target throwers at each sporting clay station for a total of at least
sixty (60) mechanical target throwers. Of the mechanical target throw-
ers:
(i) At least two (2) of the mechanical target throwers shall be
capable of throwing rabbit targets; and
(ii) At least three (3) shall be teal/chandelle mechanical target
throwers;
(c) One (1) five-stand station that has at least ten (10) mechanical
throwing machines, of which there are at least:
(i) Two (2) tower-mounted throwing machines;
(ii) One (1) machine capable of throwing rabbit targets; and
(iii) One (1) teal/chandelle mechanical target throwing machine;
(d) Such other commercial trap machines as are desired by the depart-
ment of fish and game; and
(e) Public infrastructure sufficient to accommodate patrons of the
complex, including but not limited to constructing and maintaining:


(i) A clubhouse and bathrooms with sufficient parking for vehi-
cles with trailers;
(ii) Outdoor seating and safety signage;
(iii) Pathways for public use that are navigable by off-highway
vehicles and golf carts; and
(iv) Storage facilities.
(4) Under no circumstances shall the skeet and trap shooting range lo-
cated in Kootenai county cease operations while the department is leasing
such lands prior to the opening of the shotgun sporting complex on Idaho fish
and game lands adjacent to Farragut state park.
(a) The department of fish and game shall be responsible for the con-
tinued operation and management of the shooting range regardless of
whether the department fails to find a suitable concessionaire or the
concessionaire terminates its lease or otherwise fails to operate the
range.
(b) The department shall continue leasing the Kootenai county land un-
til the shotgun sporting complex is opened to the public. Such lease
shall not be terminated or not renewed by fault, in any way, of the de-
partment unless such action is necessary due to the sporting complex be-
ing opened to the public.
(5) To fulfill the duties provided by this section, the commission
shall apply for and use Pittman-Robertson wildlife restoration act funds
and such other sums appropriated to it pursuant to House Bill No. 304, as
enacted by the first regular session of the sixty-seventh Idaho legislature.
Additional moneys needed by the commission may be requested and provided
pursuant to legislative appropriation upon a showing by the commission that
moneys previously appropriated are not sufficient to or cannot cover a por-
tion of the costs to construct, operate, maintain, and keep the complex open
to the public.
(6) Each year, the department of fish and game shall provide a written
report on any actions related to the acquisition, lease, or planning of the
properties described in this section to the joint finance-appropriations
committee, senate resources and environment committee, and house resources
and conservation committee.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.